Illinois, session 104th, SB3329.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 24-3 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/24-3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 24-3)7    Sec. 24-3. Unlawful sale or delivery of firearms. 8    (A) A person commits the offense of unlawful sale or 9delivery of firearms when he or she knowingly does any of the 10following:11        (a) Sells or gives any firearm of a size which may be 12    concealed upon the person to any person under 18 years of 13    age.14        (b) Sells or gives any firearm to a person under 21 15    years of age who has been convicted of a misdemeanor other 16    than a traffic offense or adjudged delinquent.17        (c) Sells or gives any firearm to any narcotic addict.18        (d) Sells or gives any firearm to any person who has 19    been convicted of a felony under the laws of this or any 20    other jurisdiction.21        (e) Sells or gives any firearm to any person who has 22    been a patient in a mental institution within the past 5 23    years. In this subsection (e):  SB3329 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1            "Mental institution" means any hospital, 2        institution, clinic, evaluation facility, mental 3        health center, or part thereof, which is used 4        primarily for the care or treatment of persons with 5        mental illness. 6            "Patient in a mental institution" means the person 7        was admitted, either voluntarily or involuntarily, to 8        a mental institution for mental health treatment, 9        unless the treatment was voluntary and solely for an 10        alcohol abuse disorder and no other secondary 11        substance abuse disorder or mental illness.12        (f) Sells or gives any firearms to any person who is a 13    person with an intellectual disability.14        (g) Delivers any firearm, incidental to a sale, 15    without withholding delivery of the firearm for at least 16    72 hours after application for its purchase has been made, 17    or delivers a stun gun or taser, incidental to a sale, 18    without withholding delivery of the stun gun or taser for 19    at least 24 hours after application for its purchase has 20    been made. However, this paragraph (g) does not apply to: 21    (1) the sale of a firearm to a law enforcement officer if 22    the seller of the firearm knows that the person to whom he 23    or she is selling the firearm is a law enforcement officer 24    or the sale of a firearm to a person who desires to 25    purchase a firearm for use in promoting the public 26    interest incident to his or her employment as a bank   SB3329 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    guard, armed truck guard, or other similar employment; (2) 2    a mail order sale of a firearm from a federally licensed 3    firearms dealer to a nonresident of Illinois under which 4    the firearm is mailed to a federally licensed firearms 5    dealer outside the boundaries of Illinois; (3) (blank); 6    (4) the sale of a firearm to a dealer licensed as a federal 7    firearms dealer under Section 923 of the federal Gun 8    Control Act of 1968 (18 U.S.C. 923); or (5) the transfer or 9    sale of any rifle, shotgun, or other long gun to a resident 10    registered competitor or attendee or non-resident 11    registered competitor or attendee by any dealer licensed 12    as a federal firearms dealer under Section 923 of the 13    federal Gun Control Act of 1968 at competitive shooting 14    events held at the World Shooting Complex sanctioned by a 15    national governing body. For purposes of transfers or 16    sales under subparagraph (5) of this paragraph (g), the 17    Department of Natural Resources shall give notice to the 18    Illinois State Police at least 30 calendar days prior to 19    any competitive shooting events at the World Shooting 20    Complex sanctioned by a national governing body. The 21    notification shall be made on a form prescribed by the 22    Illinois State Police. The sanctioning body shall provide 23    a list of all registered competitors and attendees at 24    least 24 hours before the events to the Illinois State 25    Police. Any changes to the list of registered competitors 26    and attendees shall be forwarded to the Illinois State   SB3329 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    Police as soon as practicable. The Illinois State Police 2    must destroy the list of registered competitors and 3    attendees no later than 30 days after the date of the 4    event. Nothing in this paragraph (g) relieves a federally 5    licensed firearm dealer from the requirements of 6    conducting a NICS background check through the Illinois 7    Point of Contact under 18 U.S.C. 922(t). For purposes of 8    this paragraph (g), "application" means when the buyer and 9    seller reach an agreement to purchase a firearm. For 10    purposes of this paragraph (g), "national governing body" 11    means a group of persons who adopt rules and formulate 12    policy on behalf of a national firearm sporting 13    organization. 14        (h) While holding any license as a dealer, importer, 15    manufacturer or pawnbroker under the federal Gun Control 16    Act of 1968, manufactures, sells or delivers to any 17    unlicensed person a handgun having a barrel, slide, frame 18    or receiver which is a die casting of zinc alloy or any 19    other nonhomogeneous metal which will melt or deform at a 20    temperature of less than 800 degrees Fahrenheit. For 21    purposes of this paragraph, (1) "firearm" is defined as in 22    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act; and (2) 23    "handgun" is defined as a firearm designed to be held and 24    fired by the use of a single hand, and includes a 25    combination of parts from which such a firearm can be 26    assembled.  SB3329 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        (i) Sells or gives a firearm of any size to any person 2    under 18 years of age who does not possess a valid Firearm 3    Owner's Identification Card.4        (j) Sells or gives a firearm while engaged in the 5    business of selling firearms at wholesale or retail 6    without being licensed as a federal firearms dealer under 7    Section 923 of the federal Gun Control Act of 1968 (18 8    U.S.C. 923). In this paragraph (j):9        A person "engaged in the business" means a person who 10    devotes time, attention, and labor to engaging in the 11    activity as a regular course of trade or business with the 12    principal objective of livelihood and profit, but does not 13    include a person who makes occasional repairs of firearms 14    or who occasionally fits special barrels, stocks, or 15    trigger mechanisms to firearms.16        "With the principal objective of livelihood and 17    profit" means that the intent underlying the sale or 18    disposition of firearms is predominantly one of obtaining 19    livelihood and pecuniary gain, as opposed to other 20    intents, such as improving or liquidating a personal 21    firearms collection; however, proof of profit shall not be 22    required as to a person who engages in the regular and 23    repetitive purchase and disposition of firearms for 24    criminal purposes or terrorism.25        (k) Sells or transfers ownership of a firearm to a 26    person who does not display to the seller or transferor of   SB3329 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    the firearm either: (1) a currently valid Firearm Owner's 2    Identification Card that has previously been issued in the 3    transferee's name by the Illinois State Police under the 4    provisions of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act; 5    or (2) a currently valid license to carry a concealed 6    firearm that has previously been issued in the 7    transferee's name by the Illinois State Police under the 8    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. This paragraph (k) does not 9    apply to the transfer of a firearm to a person who is 10    exempt from the requirement of possessing a Firearm 11    Owner's Identification Card under Section 2 of the Firearm 12    Owners Identification Card Act. For the purposes of this 13    Section, a currently valid Firearm Owner's Identification 14    Card or license to carry a concealed firearm means receipt 15    of an approval number issued in accordance with subsection 16    (a-10) of Section 3 or Section 3.1 of the Firearm Owners 17    Identification Card Act.18            (1) In addition to the other requirements of this 19        paragraph (k), all persons who are not federally 20        licensed firearms dealers must also have complied with 21        subsection (a-10) of Section 3 of the Firearm Owners 22        Identification Card Act by determining the validity of 23        a purchaser's Firearm Owner's Identification Card.24            (2) All sellers or transferors who have complied 25        with the requirements of subparagraph (1) of this 26        paragraph (k) shall not be liable for damages in any   SB3329 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        civil action arising from the use or misuse by the 2        transferee of the firearm transferred, except for 3        willful or wanton misconduct on the part of the seller 4        or transferor. 5        (l) Not being entitled to the possession of a firearm, 6    delivers the firearm, knowing it to have been stolen or 7    converted. It may be inferred that a person who possesses 8    a firearm with knowledge that its serial number has been 9    removed or altered has knowledge that the firearm is 10    stolen or converted. 11        (m) Gives a firearm or firearm parts to or allows a 12    respondent in an order of protection action access to a 13    firearm or firearm parts in violation of a court order 14    under Section 112A-14(b)(14.5)(E) or (F) of the Code of 15    Criminal Procedure of 1963 or subparagraph (D) or (E) of 16    paragraph (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of the 17    Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986. 18    (B) Paragraph (h) of subsection (A) does not include 19firearms sold within 6 months after enactment of Public Act 2078-355 (approved August 21, 1973, effective October 1, 1973), 21nor is any firearm legally owned or possessed by any citizen or 22purchased by any citizen within 6 months after the enactment 23of Public Act 78-355 subject to confiscation or seizure under 24the provisions of that Public Act. Nothing in Public Act 2578-355 shall be construed to prohibit the gift or trade of any 26firearm if that firearm was legally held or acquired within 6   SB3329 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1months after the enactment of that Public Act.2    (C) Sentence.3        (1) Any person convicted of unlawful sale or delivery 4    of firearms in violation of paragraph (c), (e), (f), (g), 5    or (h) of subsection (A) commits a Class 4 felony.6        (2) Any person convicted of unlawful sale or delivery 7    of firearms in violation of paragraph (b) or (i) of 8    subsection (A) commits a Class 3 felony.9        (3) Any person convicted of unlawful sale or delivery 10    of firearms in violation of paragraph (a) of subsection 11    (A) commits a Class 2 felony.12        (4) Any person convicted of unlawful sale or delivery 13    of firearms in violation of paragraph (a), (b), or (i) of 14    subsection (A) in any school, on the real property 15    comprising a school, within 1,000 feet of the real 16    property comprising a school, at a school related 17    activity, or on or within 1,000 feet of any conveyance 18    owned, leased, or contracted by a school or school 19    district to transport students to or from school or a 20    school related activity, regardless of the time of day or 21    time of year at which the offense was committed, commits a 22    Class 1 felony. Any person convicted of a second or 23    subsequent violation of unlawful sale or delivery of 24    firearms in violation of paragraph (a), (b), or (i) of 25    subsection (A) in any school, on the real property 26    comprising a school, within 1,000 feet of the real   SB3329 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    property comprising a school, at a school related 2    activity, or on or within 1,000 feet of any conveyance 3    owned, leased, or contracted by a school or school 4    district to transport students to or from school or a 5    school related activity, regardless of the time of day or 6    time of year at which the offense was committed, commits a 7    Class 1 felony for which the sentence shall be a term of 8    imprisonment of no less than 5 years and no more than 15 9    years.10        (5) Any person convicted of unlawful sale or delivery 11    of firearms in violation of paragraph (a) or (i) of 12    subsection (A) in residential property owned, operated, or 13    managed by a public housing agency or leased by a public 14    housing agency as part of a scattered site or mixed-income 15    development, in a public park, in a courthouse, on 16    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 17    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 18    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development, 19    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 20    real property comprising any courthouse, or on any public 21    way within 1,000 feet of the real property comprising any 22    public park, courthouse, or residential property owned, 23    operated, or managed by a public housing agency or leased 24    by a public housing agency as part of a scattered site or 25    mixed-income development commits a Class 2 felony.26        (6) Any person convicted of unlawful sale or delivery   SB3329 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    of firearms in violation of paragraph (j) of subsection 2    (A) commits a Class A misdemeanor. A second or subsequent 3    violation is a Class 4 felony.4        (7) Any person convicted of unlawful sale or delivery 5    of firearms in violation of paragraph (k) of subsection 6    (A) commits a Class 4 felony, except that a violation of 7    subparagraph (1) of paragraph (k) of subsection (A) shall 8    not be punishable as a crime or petty offense. A third or 9    subsequent conviction for a violation of paragraph (k) of 10    subsection (A) is a Class 1 felony. 11        (8) A person 18 years of age or older convicted of 12    unlawful sale or delivery of firearms in violation of 13    paragraph (a) or (i) of subsection (A), when the firearm 14    that was sold or given to another person under 18 years of 15    age was used in the commission of or attempt to commit a 16    forcible felony, shall be fined or imprisoned, or both, 17    not to exceed the maximum provided for the most serious 18    forcible felony so committed or attempted by the person 19    under 18 years of age who was sold or given the firearm. 20        (9) Any person convicted of unlawful sale or delivery 21    of firearms in violation of paragraph (d) of subsection 22    (A) commits a Class 3 felony.23        (10) Any person convicted of unlawful sale or delivery 24    of firearms in violation of paragraph (l) of subsection 25    (A) commits a Class 2 felony if the delivery is of one 26    firearm. Any person convicted of unlawful sale or delivery   SB3329 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    of firearms in violation of paragraph (l) of subsection 2    (A) commits a Class 1 felony if the delivery is of not less 3    than 2 and not more than 5 firearms at the same time or 4    within a one-year period. Any person convicted of unlawful 5    sale or delivery of firearms in violation of paragraph (l) 6    of subsection (A) commits a Class X felony for which he or 7    she shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not 8    less than 6 years and not more than 30 years if the 9    delivery is of not less than 6 and not more than 10 10    firearms at the same time or within a 2-year period. Any 11    person convicted of unlawful sale or delivery of firearms 12    in violation of paragraph (l) of subsection (A) commits a 13    Class X felony for which he or she shall be sentenced to a 14    term of imprisonment of not less than 6 years and not more 15    than 40 years if the delivery is of not less than 11 and 16    not more than 20 firearms at the same time or within a 17    3-year period. Any person convicted of unlawful sale or 18    delivery of firearms in violation of paragraph (l) of 19    subsection (A) commits a Class X felony for which he or she 20    shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less 21    than 6 years and not more than 50 years if the delivery is 22    of not less than 21 and not more than 30 firearms at the 23    same time or within a 4-year period. Any person convicted 24    of unlawful sale or delivery of firearms in violation of 25    paragraph (l) of subsection (A) commits a Class X felony 26    for which he or she shall be sentenced to a term of   SB3329 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    imprisonment of not less than 6 years and not more than 60 2    years if the delivery is of 31 or more firearms at the same 3    time or within a 5-year period. 4        (11) Any person convicted of unlawful sale or delivery 5    of firearms in violation of paragraph (m) of subsection 6    (A) commits a Class A misdemeanor. A second or subsequent 7    violation is a Class 4 felony. 8    (D) For purposes of this Section:9    "School" means a public or private elementary or secondary 10school, community college, college, or university.11    "School related activity" means any sporting, social, 12academic, or other activity for which students' attendance or 13participation is sponsored, organized, or funded in whole or 14in part by a school or school district.15    (E) A prosecution for a violation of paragraph (k) of 16subsection (A) of this Section may be commenced within 6 years 17after the commission of the offense. A prosecution for a 18violation of this Section other than paragraph (g) of 19subsection (A) of this Section may be commenced within 5 years 20after the commission of the offense defined in the particular 21paragraph. 22(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 23102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 24    Section 10. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 25amended by changing Section 112A-14 as follows:   SB3329 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    (725 ILCS 5/112A-14)  (from Ch. 38, par. 112A-14)2    Sec. 112A-14. Domestic violence order of protection; 3remedies. 4    (a) (Blank).5    (b) The court may order any of the remedies listed in this 6subsection (b). The remedies listed in this subsection (b) 7shall be in addition to other civil or criminal remedies 8available to petitioner.9        (1) Prohibition of abuse. Prohibit respondent's 10    harassment, interference with personal liberty, 11    intimidation of a dependent, physical abuse, or willful 12    deprivation, as defined in this Article, if such abuse has 13    occurred or otherwise appears likely to occur if not 14    prohibited.15        (2) Grant of exclusive possession of residence. 16    Prohibit respondent from entering or remaining in any 17    residence, household, or premises of the petitioner, 18    including one owned or leased by respondent, if petitioner 19    has a right to occupancy thereof. The grant of exclusive 20    possession of the residence, household, or premises shall 21    not affect title to real property, nor shall the court be 22    limited by the standard set forth in subsection (c-2) of 23    Section 501 of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 24    Marriage Act.25            (A) Right to occupancy. A party has a right to   SB3329 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        occupancy of a residence or household if it is solely 2        or jointly owned or leased by that party, that party's 3        spouse, a person with a legal duty to support that 4        party or a minor child in that party's care, or by any 5        person or entity other than the opposing party that 6        authorizes that party's occupancy (e.g., a domestic 7        violence shelter). Standards set forth in subparagraph 8        (B) shall not preclude equitable relief.9            (B) Presumption of hardships. If petitioner and 10        respondent each has the right to occupancy of a 11        residence or household, the court shall balance (i) 12        the hardships to respondent and any minor child or 13        dependent adult in respondent's care resulting from 14        entry of this remedy with (ii) the hardships to 15        petitioner and any minor child or dependent adult in 16        petitioner's care resulting from continued exposure to 17        the risk of abuse (should petitioner remain at the 18        residence or household) or from loss of possession of 19        the residence or household (should petitioner leave to 20        avoid the risk of abuse). When determining the balance 21        of hardships, the court shall also take into account 22        the accessibility of the residence or household. 23        Hardships need not be balanced if respondent does not 24        have a right to occupancy.25            The balance of hardships is presumed to favor 26        possession by petitioner unless the presumption is   SB3329 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence, showing 2        that the hardships to respondent substantially 3        outweigh the hardships to petitioner and any minor 4        child or dependent adult in petitioner's care. The 5        court, on the request of petitioner or on its own 6        motion, may order respondent to provide suitable, 7        accessible, alternate housing for petitioner instead 8        of excluding respondent from a mutual residence or 9        household.10        (3) Stay away order and additional prohibitions. Order 11    respondent to stay away from petitioner or any other 12    person protected by the domestic violence order of 13    protection, or prohibit respondent from entering or 14    remaining present at petitioner's school, place of 15    employment, or other specified places at times when 16    petitioner is present, or both, if reasonable, given the 17    balance of hardships. Hardships need not be balanced for 18    the court to enter a stay away order or prohibit entry if 19    respondent has no right to enter the premises.20            (A) If a domestic violence order of protection 21        grants petitioner exclusive possession of the 22        residence, prohibits respondent from entering the 23        residence, or orders respondent to stay away from 24        petitioner or other protected persons, then the court 25        may allow respondent access to the residence to remove 26        items of clothing and personal adornment used   SB3329 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        exclusively by respondent, medications, and other 2        items as the court directs. The right to access shall 3        be exercised on only one occasion as the court directs 4        and in the presence of an agreed-upon adult third 5        party or law enforcement officer.6            (B) When the petitioner and the respondent attend 7        the same public, private, or non-public elementary, 8        middle, or high school, the court when issuing a 9        domestic violence order of protection and providing 10        relief shall consider the severity of the act, any 11        continuing physical danger or emotional distress to 12        the petitioner, the educational rights guaranteed to 13        the petitioner and respondent under federal and State 14        law, the availability of a transfer of the respondent 15        to another school, a change of placement or a change of 16        program of the respondent, the expense, difficulty, 17        and educational disruption that would be caused by a 18        transfer of the respondent to another school, and any 19        other relevant facts of the case. The court may order 20        that the respondent not attend the public, private, or 21        non-public elementary, middle, or high school attended 22        by the petitioner, order that the respondent accept a 23        change of placement or change of program, as 24        determined by the school district or private or 25        non-public school, or place restrictions on the 26        respondent's movements within the school attended by   SB3329 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        the petitioner. The respondent bears the burden of 2        proving by a preponderance of the evidence that a 3        transfer, change of placement, or change of program of 4        the respondent is not available. The respondent also 5        bears the burden of production with respect to the 6        expense, difficulty, and educational disruption that 7        would be caused by a transfer of the respondent to 8        another school. A transfer, change of placement, or 9        change of program is not unavailable to the respondent 10        solely on the ground that the respondent does not 11        agree with the school district's or private or 12        non-public school's transfer, change of placement, or 13        change of program or solely on the ground that the 14        respondent fails or refuses to consent or otherwise 15        does not take an action required to effectuate a 16        transfer, change of placement, or change of program. 17        When a court orders a respondent to stay away from the 18        public, private, or non-public school attended by the 19        petitioner and the respondent requests a transfer to 20        another attendance center within the respondent's 21        school district or private or non-public school, the 22        school district or private or non-public school shall 23        have sole discretion to determine the attendance 24        center to which the respondent is transferred. If the 25        court order results in a transfer of the minor 26        respondent to another attendance center, a change in   SB3329 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        the respondent's placement, or a change of the 2        respondent's program, the parents, guardian, or legal 3        custodian of the respondent is responsible for 4        transportation and other costs associated with the 5        transfer or change.6            (C) The court may order the parents, guardian, or 7        legal custodian of a minor respondent to take certain 8        actions or to refrain from taking certain actions to 9        ensure that the respondent complies with the order. If 10        the court orders a transfer of the respondent to 11        another school, the parents, guardian, or legal 12        custodian of the respondent is responsible for 13        transportation and other costs associated with the 14        change of school by the respondent. 15        (4) Counseling. Require or recommend the respondent to 16    undergo counseling for a specified duration with a social 17    worker, psychologist, clinical psychologist, 18    psychiatrist, family service agency, alcohol or substance 19    abuse program, mental health center guidance counselor, 20    agency providing services to elders, program designed for 21    domestic violence abusers, or any other guidance service 22    the court deems appropriate. The court may order the 23    respondent in any intimate partner relationship to report 24    to an Illinois Department of Human Services protocol 25    approved partner abuse intervention program for an 26    assessment and to follow all recommended treatment.   SB3329 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        (5) Physical care and possession of the minor child. 2    In order to protect the minor child from abuse, neglect, 3    or unwarranted separation from the person who has been the 4    minor child's primary caretaker, or to otherwise protect 5    the well-being of the minor child, the court may do either 6    or both of the following: (i) grant petitioner physical 7    care or possession of the minor child, or both, or (ii) 8    order respondent to return a minor child to, or not remove 9    a minor child from, the physical care of a parent or person 10    in loco parentis.11        If the respondent is charged with abuse (as defined in 12    Section 112A-3 of this Code) of a minor child, there shall 13    be a rebuttable presumption that awarding physical care to 14    respondent would not be in the minor child's best 15    interest.16        (6) Temporary allocation of parental responsibilities 17    and significant decision-making responsibilities. Award 18    temporary significant decision-making responsibility to 19    petitioner in accordance with this Section, the Illinois 20    Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, the Illinois 21    Parentage Act of 2015, and this State's Uniform 22    Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act. 23        If the respondent is charged with abuse (as defined in 24    Section 112A-3 of this Code) of a minor child, there shall 25    be a rebuttable presumption that awarding temporary 26    significant decision-making responsibility to respondent   SB3329 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    would not be in the child's best interest.2        (7) Parenting time. Determine the parenting time, if 3    any, of respondent in any case in which the court awards 4    physical care or temporary significant decision-making 5    responsibility of a minor child to petitioner. The court 6    shall restrict or deny respondent's parenting time with a 7    minor child if the court finds that respondent has done or 8    is likely to do any of the following:9            (i) abuse or endanger the minor child during 10        parenting time;11            (ii) use the parenting time as an opportunity to 12        abuse or harass petitioner or petitioner's family or 13        household members;14            (iii) improperly conceal or detain the minor 15        child; or16            (iv) otherwise act in a manner that is not in the 17        best interests of the minor child. 18        The court shall not be limited by the standards set 19    forth in Section 603.10 of the Illinois Marriage and 20    Dissolution of Marriage Act. If the court grants parenting 21    time, the order shall specify dates and times for the 22    parenting time to take place or other specific parameters 23    or conditions that are appropriate. No order for parenting 24    time shall refer merely to the term "reasonable parenting 25    time". Petitioner may deny respondent access to the minor 26    child if, when respondent arrives for parenting time,   SB3329 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    respondent is under the influence of drugs or alcohol and 2    constitutes a threat to the safety and well-being of 3    petitioner or petitioner's minor children or is behaving 4    in a violent or abusive manner. If necessary to protect 5    any member of petitioner's family or household from future 6    abuse, respondent shall be prohibited from coming to 7    petitioner's residence to meet the minor child for 8    parenting time, and the petitioner and respondent shall 9    submit to the court their recommendations for reasonable 10    alternative arrangements for parenting time. A person may 11    be approved to supervise parenting time only after filing 12    an affidavit accepting that responsibility and 13    acknowledging accountability to the court.14        (8) Removal or concealment of minor child. Prohibit 15    respondent from removing a minor child from the State or 16    concealing the child within the State.17        (9) Order to appear. Order the respondent to appear in 18    court, alone or with a minor child, to prevent abuse, 19    neglect, removal or concealment of the child, to return 20    the child to the custody or care of the petitioner, or to 21    permit any court-ordered interview or examination of the 22    child or the respondent.23        (10) Possession of personal property. Grant petitioner 24    exclusive possession of personal property and, if 25    respondent has possession or control, direct respondent to 26    promptly make it available to petitioner, if:  SB3329 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 2        property; or3            (ii) the petitioner and respondent own the 4        property jointly; sharing it would risk abuse of 5        petitioner by respondent or is impracticable; and the 6        balance of hardships favors temporary possession by 7        petitioner.8        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 9    property is that it is marital property, the court may 10    award petitioner temporary possession thereof under the 11    standards of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph only if a 12    proper proceeding has been filed under the Illinois 13    Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as now or 14    hereafter amended.15        No order under this provision shall affect title to 16    property.17        (11) Protection of property. Forbid the respondent 18    from taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, 19    damaging, or otherwise disposing of any real or personal 20    property, except as explicitly authorized by the court, 21    if:22            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 23        property; or24            (ii) the petitioner and respondent own the 25        property jointly, and the balance of hardships favors 26        granting this remedy.  SB3329 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 2    property is that it is marital property, the court may 3    grant petitioner relief under subparagraph (ii) of this 4    paragraph only if a proper proceeding has been filed under 5    the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 6    now or hereafter amended.7        The court may further prohibit respondent from 8    improperly using the financial or other resources of an 9    aged member of the family or household for the profit or 10    advantage of respondent or of any other person.11        (11.5) Protection of animals. Grant the petitioner the 12    exclusive care, custody, or control of any animal owned, 13    possessed, leased, kept, or held by either the petitioner 14    or the respondent or a minor child residing in the 15    residence or household of either the petitioner or the 16    respondent and order the respondent to stay away from the 17    animal and forbid the respondent from taking, 18    transferring, encumbering, concealing, harming, or 19    otherwise disposing of the animal. 20        (12) Order for payment of support. Order respondent to 21    pay temporary support for the petitioner or any child in 22    the petitioner's care or over whom the petitioner has been 23    allocated parental responsibility, when the respondent has 24    a legal obligation to support that person, in accordance 25    with the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage 26    Act, which shall govern, among other matters, the amount   SB3329 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    of support, payment through the clerk and withholding of 2    income to secure payment. An order for child support may 3    be granted to a petitioner with lawful physical care of a 4    child, or an order or agreement for physical care of a 5    child, prior to entry of an order allocating significant 6    decision-making responsibility. Such a support order shall 7    expire upon entry of a valid order allocating parental 8    responsibility differently and vacating petitioner's 9    significant decision-making responsibility unless 10    otherwise provided in the order.11        (13) Order for payment of losses. Order respondent to 12    pay petitioner for losses suffered as a direct result of 13    the abuse. Such losses shall include, but not be limited 14    to, medical expenses, lost earnings or other support, 15    repair or replacement of property damaged or taken, 16    reasonable attorney's fees, court costs, and moving or 17    other travel expenses, including additional reasonable 18    expenses for temporary shelter and restaurant meals.19            (i) Losses affecting family needs. If a party is 20        entitled to seek maintenance, child support, or 21        property distribution from the other party under the 22        Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 23        now or hereafter amended, the court may order 24        respondent to reimburse petitioner's actual losses, to 25        the extent that such reimbursement would be 26        "appropriate temporary relief", as authorized by   SB3329 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        subsection (a)(3) of Section 501 of that Act.2            (ii) Recovery of expenses. In the case of an 3        improper concealment or removal of a minor child, the 4        court may order respondent to pay the reasonable 5        expenses incurred or to be incurred in the search for 6        and recovery of the minor child, including, but not 7        limited to, legal fees, court costs, private 8        investigator fees, and travel costs.9        (14) Prohibition of entry. Prohibit the respondent 10    from entering or remaining in the residence or household 11    while the respondent is under the influence of alcohol or 12    drugs and constitutes a threat to the safety and 13    well-being of the petitioner or the petitioner's children.14        (14.5) Prohibition of possession of firearms and 15    firearm parts; search and seizure of firearms and firearm 16    parts. 17            (A) Subject to the provisions of subparagraph 18        (B-2), if applicable, a person who is subject to an 19        existing domestic violence order of protection issued 20        under this Code may not lawfully possess firearms or 21        firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 22        operable firearm or a Firearm Owner's Identification 23        Card under Section 8.2 of the Firearm Owners 24        Identification Card Act.25            (B) Any firearms in the possession of the 26        respondent, except as provided in subparagraph (C) of   SB3329 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        this paragraph (14.5) and subject to the provisions of 2        subparagraph (B-2), if applicable, shall be ordered by 3        the court to be surrendered to law enforcement for 4        safekeeping. Any firearms or firearm parts on the 5        respondent's person or at the place of service shall 6        be immediately surrendered to the serving officers at 7        the time of service of the order of protection, and any 8        other firearms or firearm parts shall be surrendered 9        to local law enforcement within 24 hours of service of 10        the order of protection. Any Firearm Owner's 11        Identification Card or Concealed Carry License in the 12        possession of the respondent, except as provided in 13        subparagraph (C), shall also be ordered by the court 14        to be turned over to serving officers at the time of 15        service of the order of protection or, if not on the 16        respondent's person or at the location where the 17        respondent is served at the time of service, to local 18        law enforcement within 24 hours of service of the 19        order. The law enforcement agency shall immediately 20        mail the card, as well as any license, to the Illinois 21        State Police Firearm Owner's Identification Card 22        Office for safekeeping. 23            (B-1) Upon request of the petitioner or the 24        State's Attorney on behalf of the petitioner, a law 25        enforcement officer may seek a search warrant based on 26        the allegations in the petition for the Order of   SB3329 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        Protection. 2                (i) If requested by law enforcement, the court 3            shall issue a search warrant for the seizure of 4            any firearms or firearm parts that could be 5            assembled to make an operable firearm belonging to 6            the respondent at or after entry of an order of 7            protection if the court, based upon sworn 8            testimony and governed by Sections 108-3 and 9            108-4, finds probable cause exists that: 10                    (aa) the respondent poses an immediate and 11                present credible threat to the physical safety 12                of the petitioner protected by the order of 13                protection; 14                    (bb) the respondent possesses firearms or 15                firearm parts that could be assembled to make 16                an operable firearm; and17                    (cc) the firearms or firearm parts that 18                could be assembled to make an operable firearm 19                are located at the residence, vehicle, or 20                other property of the respondent to be 21                searched. 22                (ii) The search warrant shall specify with 23            particularity the scope of the search, including 24            the property to be searched, and shall direct the 25            law enforcement agency to seize the respondent's 26            firearms and firearm parts that could be assembled   SB3329 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1            to make an operable firearm. Law enforcement shall 2            also be directed to seize into their possession 3            any Firearm Owner's Identification Card and any 4            Concealed Carry License belonging to the 5            respondent. 6                (iii) The law enforcement agency to which the 7            court has directed the warrant shall execute the 8            warrant no later than 96 hours after issuance. The 9            law enforcement agency to which the court has 10            directed the warrant may coordinate with other law 11            enforcement agencies to execute the warrant. A 12            return of the warrant shall be filed by the law 13            enforcement agency within 24 hours of execution, 14            setting forth the time, date, and location where 15            the warrant was executed and what items, if any, 16            were seized. If the court is not in session, the 17            return information shall be returned on the next 18            date the court is in session. Subject to the 19            provisions of this Section, peace officers shall 20            have the same authority to execute a warrant 21            issued under this subsection as a warrant issued 22            under Article 108.23                (iv) If the property to be searched is in 24            another county, the petitioner or the State's 25            Attorney may seek a search warrant in that county 26            with the law enforcement agency with primary   SB3329 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1            responsibility for responding to service calls at 2            the property to be searched. Regardless of whether 3            the petitioner is working with the State's 4            Attorney under subsection (d) of Section 112A-4.5, 5            the petitioner may request the State's Attorney's 6            assistance to request that the law enforcement 7            agency in the county where the property is located 8            seek a search warrant.9                (v) Service of an order of protection shall, 10            to the extent possible, be concurrent with any 11            warrant issued under this paragraph.12            (B-2) Ex parte relief may be granted under this 13        paragraph (14.5) only if the court finds that personal 14        injury to the petitioner is likely to occur if the 15        respondent received prior notice and if the petitioner 16        has otherwise satisfied the requirements of Section 17        112A-17.5 of this Article. 18            (C) If the respondent is a peace officer as 19        defined in Section 2-13 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 20        the court shall order that any firearms used by the 21        respondent in the performance of his or her duties as a 22        peace officer be surrendered to the chief law 23        enforcement executive of the agency in which the 24        respondent is employed, who shall retain the firearms 25        for safekeeping for the duration of the domestic 26        violence order of protection.  SB3329 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1            (D)(i) Any firearms or firearm parts that could be 2        assembled to make an operable firearm that have been 3        seized or surrendered shall be kept by the law 4        enforcement agency that took possession of the items 5        for safekeeping, except as provided in subparagraph 6        (C), (E), or (F). The period of safekeeping shall be 7        for the duration of the order of protection. Except as 8        provided in subparagraph (F), the respondent is 9        prohibited from transferring firearms or firearm parts 10        to another individual in lieu of surrender to law 11        enforcement. The law enforcement agency shall provide 12        an itemized statement of receipt to the respondent and 13        the court describing any seized or surrendered 14        firearms or firearm parts and informing the respondent 15        that the respondent may seek the return of the 16        respondent's items at the end of the order of 17        protection. The law enforcement agency may enter 18        arrangements, as needed, with federally licensed 19        firearm dealers or other law enforcement agencies for 20        the storage of any firearms seized or surrendered 21        under this subsection.22            (ii) It is the respondent's responsibility to 23        request the return or reinstatement of any Firearm 24        Owner's Identification Card or Concealed Carry License 25        and to notify the Illinois State Police Firearm 26        Owner's Identification Card Office at the end of the   SB3329 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        Order of Protection.2            (iii) At the end of the order of protection, a 3        respondent may request the return of any seized or 4        surrendered firearms or firearm parts that could be 5        assembled to make an operable firearm. Seized or 6        surrendered firearms or firearm parts shall be 7        returned within 14 days of the request to the 8        respondent, if the respondent is lawfully eligible to 9        possess firearms, or to a designated third party who 10        is lawfully eligible to possess firearms. If the 11        firearms or firearm parts cannot be returned to 12        respondent because (1) the respondent has not 13        requested the return or transfer of the firearms or 14        firearm parts as set forth in this subparagraph and 15        (2) the respondent cannot be located or fails to 16        respond to more than 3 requests to retrieve the 17        firearms, upon petition from the appropriate law 18        enforcement agency and notice to the respondent at the 19        respondent's last known address, the court may order 20        the law enforcement agency to destroy the firearms or 21        firearm parts; use the firearms or firearm parts for 22        training purposes, or for any other application as 23        deemed appropriate by the law enforcement agency; or 24        turn over the firearms or firearm parts to a third 25        party who is lawfully eligible to possess firearms, 26        and who does not reside with respondent.   SB3329 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1            (E)(i) If a person other than the respondent 2        claims title to any firearms or firearm parts that 3        could be assembled to make an operable firearm seized 4        or surrendered under this subsection, the person may 5        petition the court to have the firearm and firearm 6        parts that could be assembled to make an operable 7        firearm returned to him or her with proper notice to 8        the petitioner and respondent. If, at a hearing on the 9        petition, the court determines the person to be the 10        lawful owner of the firearm and firearm parts that 11        could be assembled to make an operable firearm, the 12        firearm and firearm parts that could be assembled to 13        make an operable firearm shall be returned to the 14        person, provided that: 15                (aa) the firearm and firearm parts that could 16            be assembled to make an operable firearm are 17            removed from the respondent's custody, control, or 18            possession, and the lawful owner agrees to store 19            the firearm and firearm parts that could be 20            assembled to make an operable firearm in a manner 21            such that the respondent does not have access to 22            or control of the firearm and firearm parts that 23            could be assembled to make an operable firearm; 24            and 25                (bb) the firearm and firearm parts that could 26            be assembled to make an operable firearm are not   SB3329 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1            otherwise unlawfully possessed by the owner. 2            (ii) The person petitioning for the return of his 3        or her firearm and firearm parts that could be 4        assembled to make an operable firearm must swear or 5        affirm by affidavit that he or she:6                (aa) is the lawful owner of the firearm and 7            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 8            operable firearm;9                (bb) shall not transfer the firearm and 10            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 11            operable firearm to the respondent; and12                (cc) will store the firearm and firearm parts 13            that could be assembled to make an operable 14            firearm in a manner that the respondent does not 15            have access to or control of the firearm and 16            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 17            operable firearm. 18            (F)(i) The respondent may file a motion to 19        transfer, at the next scheduled hearing, any seized or 20        surrendered firearms or firearm parts to a third 21        party. Notice of the motion shall be provided to the 22        petitioner and the third party must appear at the 23        hearing. 24            (ii) The court may order transfer of the seized or 25        surrendered firearm or firearm parts only if:26                (aa) the third party transferee affirms by   SB3329 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1            affidavit and to the open court that: 2                    (I) the third party transferee does not 3                reside with the respondent; 4                    (II) the respondent does not have access 5                to the location in which the third party 6                transferee intends to keep the firearms or 7                firearm parts; 8                    (III) the third party transferee will not 9                transfer the firearm or firearm parts to the 10                respondent or anyone who resides with the 11                respondent; 12                    (IV) the third party transferee will 13                maintain control and possession of the firearm 14                or firearm parts until otherwise ordered by 15                the court; and 16                    (V) the third party transferee is aware 17                that transferring the firearms or firearm 18                parts or allowing the respondent access to the 19                firearms or firearm parts would be a violation 20                of Section 24-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012 21                will be subject to criminal penalties for 22                transferring the firearms or firearm parts to 23                the respondent; and 24                (bb) the court finds that: 25                    (I) the third party respondent holds a 26                valid Firearm Owner's Identification; and  SB3329 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1                    (II) the transfer of firearms or firearm 2                parts to the third party transferee does not 3                place the petitioner or any other protected 4                parties at any additional threat or risk of 5                harm. 6        (15) Prohibition of access to records. If a domestic 7    violence order of protection prohibits respondent from 8    having contact with the minor child, or if petitioner's 9    address is omitted under subsection (b) of Section 112A-5 10    of this Code, or if necessary to prevent abuse or wrongful 11    removal or concealment of a minor child, the order shall 12    deny respondent access to, and prohibit respondent from 13    inspecting, obtaining, or attempting to inspect or obtain, 14    school or any other records of the minor child who is in 15    the care of petitioner.16        (16) Order for payment of shelter services. Order 17    respondent to reimburse a shelter providing temporary 18    housing and counseling services to the petitioner for the 19    cost of the services, as certified by the shelter and 20    deemed reasonable by the court.21        (17) Order for injunctive relief. Enter injunctive 22    relief necessary or appropriate to prevent further abuse 23    of a family or household member or to effectuate one of the 24    granted remedies, if supported by the balance of 25    hardships. If the harm to be prevented by the injunction 26    is abuse or any other harm that one of the remedies listed   SB3329 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    in paragraphs (1) through (16) of this subsection is 2    designed to prevent, no further evidence is necessary to 3    establish that the harm is an irreparable injury.4        (18) Telephone services.5            (A) Unless a condition described in subparagraph 6        (B) of this paragraph exists, the court may, upon 7        request by the petitioner, order a wireless telephone 8        service provider to transfer to the petitioner the 9        right to continue to use a telephone number or numbers 10        indicated by the petitioner and the financial 11        responsibility associated with the number or numbers, 12        as set forth in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph. In 13        this paragraph (18), the term "wireless telephone 14        service provider" means a provider of commercial 15        mobile service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 332. The 16        petitioner may request the transfer of each telephone 17        number that the petitioner, or a minor child in his or 18        her custody, uses. The clerk of the court shall serve 19        the order on the wireless telephone service provider's 20        agent for service of process provided to the Illinois 21        Commerce Commission. The order shall contain all of 22        the following: 23                (i) The name and billing telephone number of 24            the account holder including the name of the 25            wireless telephone service provider that serves 26            the account.  SB3329 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1                (ii) Each telephone number that will be 2            transferred.3                (iii) A statement that the provider transfers 4            to the petitioner all financial responsibility for 5            and right to the use of any telephone number 6            transferred under this paragraph.7            (B) A wireless telephone service provider shall 8        terminate the respondent's use of, and shall transfer 9        to the petitioner use of, the telephone number or 10        numbers indicated in subparagraph (A) of this 11        paragraph unless it notifies the petitioner, within 72 12        hours after it receives the order, that one of the 13        following applies:14                (i) The account holder named in the order has 15            terminated the account.16                (ii) A difference in network technology would 17            prevent or impair the functionality of a device on 18            a network if the transfer occurs.19                (iii) The transfer would cause a geographic or 20            other limitation on network or service provision 21            to the petitioner.22                (iv) Another technological or operational 23            issue would prevent or impair the use of the 24            telephone number if the transfer occurs.25            (C) The petitioner assumes all financial 26        responsibility for and right to the use of any   SB3329 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        telephone number transferred under this paragraph. In 2        this paragraph, "financial responsibility" includes 3        monthly service costs and costs associated with any 4        mobile device associated with the number.5            (D) A wireless telephone service provider may 6        apply to the petitioner its routine and customary 7        requirements for establishing an account or 8        transferring a number, including requiring the 9        petitioner to provide proof of identification, 10        financial information, and customer preferences.11            (E) Except for willful or wanton misconduct, a 12        wireless telephone service provider is immune from 13        civil liability for its actions taken in compliance 14        with a court order issued under this paragraph.15            (F) All wireless service providers that provide 16        services to residential customers shall provide to the 17        Illinois Commerce Commission the name and address of 18        an agent for service of orders entered under this 19        paragraph (18). Any change in status of the registered 20        agent must be reported to the Illinois Commerce 21        Commission within 30 days of such change. 22            (G) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall 23        maintain the list of registered agents for service for 24        each wireless telephone service provider on the 25        Commission's website. The Commission may consult with 26        wireless telephone service providers and the Circuit   SB3329 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        Court Clerks on the manner in which this information 2        is provided and displayed. 3    (c) Relevant factors; findings.4        (1) In determining whether to grant a specific remedy, 5    other than payment of support, the court shall consider 6    relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the 7    following:8            (i) the nature, frequency, severity, pattern, and 9        consequences of the respondent's past abuse of the 10        petitioner or any family or household member, 11        including the concealment of his or her location in 12        order to evade service of process or notice, and the 13        likelihood of danger of future abuse to petitioner or 14        any member of petitioner's or respondent's family or 15        household; and16            (ii) the danger that any minor child will be 17        abused or neglected or improperly relocated from the 18        jurisdiction, improperly concealed within the State, 19        or improperly separated from the child's primary 20        caretaker.21        (2) In comparing relative hardships resulting to the 22    parties from loss of possession of the family home, the 23    court shall consider relevant factors, including, but not 24    limited to, the following:25            (i) availability, accessibility, cost, safety, 26        adequacy, location, and other characteristics of   SB3329 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        alternate housing for each party and any minor child 2        or dependent adult in the party's care;3            (ii) the effect on the party's employment; and4            (iii) the effect on the relationship of the party, 5        and any minor child or dependent adult in the party's 6        care, to family, school, church, and community.7        (3) Subject to the exceptions set forth in paragraph 8    (4) of this subsection (c), the court shall make its 9    findings in an official record or in writing, and shall at 10    a minimum set forth the following:11            (i) That the court has considered the applicable 12        relevant factors described in paragraphs (1) and (2) 13        of this subsection (c).14            (ii) Whether the conduct or actions of respondent, 15        unless prohibited, will likely cause irreparable harm 16        or continued abuse.17            (iii) Whether it is necessary to grant the 18        requested relief in order to protect petitioner or 19        other alleged abused persons.20        (4) (Blank).21        (5) Never married parties. No rights or 22    responsibilities for a minor child born outside of 23    marriage attach to a putative father until a father and 24    child relationship has been established under the Illinois 25    Parentage Act of 1984, the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, 26    the Illinois Public Aid Code, Section 12 of the Vital   SB3329 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    Records Act, the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the Probate 2    Act of 1975, the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, 3    the Expedited Child Support Act of 1990, any judicial, 4    administrative, or other act of another state or 5    territory, any other statute of this State, or by any 6    foreign nation establishing the father and child 7    relationship, any other proceeding substantially in 8    conformity with the federal Personal Responsibility and 9    Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, or when both 10    parties appeared in open court or at an administrative 11    hearing acknowledging under oath or admitting by 12    affirmation the existence of a father and child 13    relationship. Absent such an adjudication, no putative 14    father shall be granted temporary allocation of parental 15    responsibilities, including parenting time with the minor 16    child, or physical care and possession of the minor child, 17    nor shall an order of payment for support of the minor 18    child be entered.19    (d) Balance of hardships; findings. If the court finds 20that the balance of hardships does not support the granting of 21a remedy governed by paragraph (2), (3), (10), (11), or (16) of 22subsection (b) of this Section, which may require such 23balancing, the court's findings shall so indicate and shall 24include a finding as to whether granting the remedy will 25result in hardship to respondent that would substantially 26outweigh the hardship to petitioner from denial of the remedy.   SB3329 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1The findings shall be an official record or in writing.2    (e) Denial of remedies. Denial of any remedy shall not be 3based, in whole or in part, on evidence that:4        (1) respondent has cause for any use of force, unless 5    that cause satisfies the standards for justifiable use of 6    force provided by Article 7 of the Criminal Code of 2012;7        (2) respondent was voluntarily intoxicated;8        (3) petitioner acted in self-defense or defense of 9    another, provided that, if petitioner utilized force, such 10    force was justifiable under Article 7 of the Criminal Code 11    of 2012; 12        (4) petitioner did not act in self-defense or defense 13    of another;14        (5) petitioner left the residence or household to 15    avoid further abuse by respondent;16        (6) petitioner did not leave the residence or 17    household to avoid further abuse by respondent; or 18        (7) conduct by any family or household member excused 19    the abuse by respondent, unless that same conduct would 20    have excused such abuse if the parties had not been family 21    or household members.22(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 23102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-1065, eff. 5-11-25.) 24    Section 15. The Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 is 25amended by changing Section 214 as follows:   SB3329 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    (750 ILCS 60/214)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2312-14)2    Sec. 214. Order of protection; remedies. 3    (a) Issuance of order. If the court finds that petitioner 4has been abused by a family or household member or that 5petitioner is a high-risk adult who has been abused, 6neglected, or exploited, as defined in this Act, an order of 7protection prohibiting the abuse, neglect, or exploitation 8shall issue; provided that petitioner must also satisfy the 9requirements of one of the following Sections, as appropriate: 10Section 217 on emergency orders, Section 218 on interim 11orders, or Section 219 on plenary orders. Petitioner shall not 12be denied an order of protection because petitioner or 13respondent is a minor. The court, when determining whether or 14not to issue an order of protection, shall not require 15physical manifestations of abuse on the person of the victim. 16Modification and extension of prior orders of protection shall 17be in accordance with this Act.18    (b) Remedies and standards. The remedies to be included in 19an order of protection shall be determined in accordance with 20this Section and one of the following Sections, as 21appropriate: Section 217 on emergency orders, Section 218 on 22interim orders, and Section 219 on plenary orders. The 23remedies listed in this subsection shall be in addition to 24other civil or criminal remedies available to petitioner.25        (1) Prohibition of abuse, neglect, or exploitation.   SB3329 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    Prohibit respondent's harassment, interference with 2    personal liberty, intimidation of a dependent, physical 3    abuse, or willful deprivation, neglect or exploitation, as 4    defined in this Act, or stalking of the petitioner, as 5    defined in Section 12-7.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012, if 6    such abuse, neglect, exploitation, or stalking has 7    occurred or otherwise appears likely to occur if not 8    prohibited.9        (2) Grant of exclusive possession of residence. 10    Prohibit respondent from entering or remaining in any 11    residence, household, or premises of the petitioner, 12    including one owned or leased by respondent, if petitioner 13    has a right to occupancy thereof. The grant of exclusive 14    possession of the residence, household, or premises shall 15    not affect title to real property, nor shall the court be 16    limited by the standard set forth in subsection (c-2) of 17    Section 501 of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 18    Marriage Act.19            (A) Right to occupancy. A party has a right to 20        occupancy of a residence or household if it is solely 21        or jointly owned or leased by that party, that party's 22        spouse, a person with a legal duty to support that 23        party or a minor child in that party's care, or by any 24        person or entity other than the opposing party that 25        authorizes that party's occupancy (e.g., a domestic 26        violence shelter). Standards set forth in subparagraph   SB3329 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        (B) shall not preclude equitable relief.2            (B) Presumption of hardships. If petitioner and 3        respondent each has the right to occupancy of a 4        residence or household, the court shall balance (i) 5        the hardships to respondent and any minor child or 6        dependent adult in respondent's care resulting from 7        entry of this remedy with (ii) the hardships to 8        petitioner and any minor child or dependent adult in 9        petitioner's care resulting from continued exposure to 10        the risk of abuse (should petitioner remain at the 11        residence or household) or from loss of possession of 12        the residence or household (should petitioner leave to 13        avoid the risk of abuse). When determining the balance 14        of hardships, the court shall also take into account 15        the accessibility of the residence or household. 16        Hardships need not be balanced if respondent does not 17        have a right to occupancy.18            The balance of hardships is presumed to favor 19        possession by petitioner unless the presumption is 20        rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence, showing 21        that the hardships to respondent substantially 22        outweigh the hardships to petitioner and any minor 23        child or dependent adult in petitioner's care. The 24        court, on the request of petitioner or on its own 25        motion, may order respondent to provide suitable, 26        accessible, alternate housing for petitioner instead   SB3329 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        of excluding respondent from a mutual residence or 2        household.3        (3) Stay away order and additional prohibitions. Order 4    respondent to stay away from petitioner or any other 5    person protected by the order of protection, or prohibit 6    respondent from entering or remaining present at 7    petitioner's school, place of employment, or other 8    specified places at times when petitioner is present, or 9    both, if reasonable, given the balance of hardships. 10    Hardships need not be balanced for the court to enter a 11    stay away order or prohibit entry if respondent has no 12    right to enter the premises.13            (A) If an order of protection grants petitioner 14        exclusive possession of the residence, or prohibits 15        respondent from entering the residence, or orders 16        respondent to stay away from petitioner or other 17        protected persons, then the court may allow respondent 18        access to the residence to remove items of clothing 19        and personal adornment used exclusively by respondent, 20        medications, and other items as the court directs. The 21        right to access shall be exercised on only one 22        occasion as the court directs and in the presence of an 23        agreed-upon adult third party or law enforcement 24        officer.25            (B) When the petitioner and the respondent attend 26        the same public, private, or non-public elementary,   SB3329 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        middle, or high school, the court when issuing an 2        order of protection and providing relief shall 3        consider the severity of the act, any continuing 4        physical danger or emotional distress to the 5        petitioner, the educational rights guaranteed to the 6        petitioner and respondent under federal and State law, 7        the availability of a transfer of the respondent to 8        another school, a change of placement or a change of 9        program of the respondent, the expense, difficulty, 10        and educational disruption that would be caused by a 11        transfer of the respondent to another school, and any 12        other relevant facts of the case. The court may order 13        that the respondent not attend the public, private, or 14        non-public elementary, middle, or high school attended 15        by the petitioner, order that the respondent accept a 16        change of placement or change of program, as 17        determined by the school district or private or 18        non-public school, or place restrictions on the 19        respondent's movements within the school attended by 20        the petitioner. The respondent bears the burden of 21        proving by a preponderance of the evidence that a 22        transfer, change of placement, or change of program of 23        the respondent is not available. The respondent also 24        bears the burden of production with respect to the 25        expense, difficulty, and educational disruption that 26        would be caused by a transfer of the respondent to   SB3329 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        another school. A transfer, change of placement, or 2        change of program is not unavailable to the respondent 3        solely on the ground that the respondent does not 4        agree with the school district's or private or 5        non-public school's transfer, change of placement, or 6        change of program or solely on the ground that the 7        respondent fails or refuses to consent or otherwise 8        does not take an action required to effectuate a 9        transfer, change of placement, or change of program. 10        When a court orders a respondent to stay away from the 11        public, private, or non-public school attended by the 12        petitioner and the respondent requests a transfer to 13        another attendance center within the respondent's 14        school district or private or non-public school, the 15        school district or private or non-public school shall 16        have sole discretion to determine the attendance 17        center to which the respondent is transferred. In the 18        event the court order results in a transfer of the 19        minor respondent to another attendance center, a 20        change in the respondent's placement, or a change of 21        the respondent's program, the parents, guardian, or 22        legal custodian of the respondent is responsible for 23        transportation and other costs associated with the 24        transfer or change. 25            (C) The court may order the parents, guardian, or 26        legal custodian of a minor respondent to take certain   SB3329 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        actions or to refrain from taking certain actions to 2        ensure that the respondent complies with the order. In 3        the event the court orders a transfer of the 4        respondent to another school, the parents, guardian, 5        or legal custodian of the respondent is responsible 6        for transportation and other costs associated with the 7        change of school by the respondent. 8        (4) Counseling. Require or recommend the respondent to 9    undergo counseling for a specified duration with a social 10    worker, psychologist, clinical psychologist, 11    psychiatrist, family service agency, alcohol or substance 12    abuse program, mental health center guidance counselor, 13    agency providing services to elders, program designed for 14    domestic violence abusers or any other guidance service 15    the court deems appropriate. The Court may order the 16    respondent in any intimate partner relationship to report 17    to an Illinois Department of Human Services protocol 18    approved partner abuse intervention program for an 19    assessment and to follow all recommended treatment. 20        (5) Physical care and possession of the minor child. 21    In order to protect the minor child from abuse, neglect, 22    or unwarranted separation from the person who has been the 23    minor child's primary caretaker, or to otherwise protect 24    the well-being of the minor child, the court may do either 25    or both of the following: (i) grant petitioner physical 26    care or possession of the minor child, or both, or (ii)   SB3329 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    order respondent to return a minor child to, or not remove 2    a minor child from, the physical care of a parent or person 3    in loco parentis.4        If a court finds, after a hearing, that respondent has 5    committed abuse (as defined in Section 103) of a minor 6    child, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that 7    awarding physical care to respondent would not be in the 8    minor child's best interest.9        (6) Temporary allocation of parental responsibilities: 10    significant decision-making. Award temporary 11    decision-making responsibility to petitioner in accordance 12    with this Section, the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution 13    of Marriage Act, the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, and 14    this State's Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and 15    Enforcement Act. 16        If a court finds, after a hearing, that respondent has 17    committed abuse (as defined in Section 103) of a minor 18    child, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that 19    awarding temporary significant decision-making 20    responsibility to respondent would not be in the child's 21    best interest.22        (7) Parenting time. Determine the parenting time, if 23    any, of respondent in any case in which the court awards 24    physical care or allocates temporary significant 25    decision-making responsibility of a minor child to 26    petitioner. The court shall restrict or deny respondent's   SB3329 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    parenting time with a minor child if the court finds that 2    respondent has done or is likely to do any of the 3    following: (i) abuse or endanger the minor child during 4    parenting time; (ii) use the parenting time as an 5    opportunity to abuse or harass petitioner or petitioner's 6    family or household members; (iii) improperly conceal or 7    detain the minor child; or (iv) otherwise act in a manner 8    that is not in the best interests of the minor child. The 9    court shall not be limited by the standards set forth in 10    Section 603.10 of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 11    Marriage Act. If the court grants parenting time, the 12    order shall specify dates and times for the parenting time 13    to take place or other specific parameters or conditions 14    that are appropriate. No order for parenting time shall 15    refer merely to the term "reasonable parenting time".16        Petitioner may deny respondent access to the minor 17    child if, when respondent arrives for parenting time, 18    respondent is under the influence of drugs or alcohol and 19    constitutes a threat to the safety and well-being of 20    petitioner or petitioner's minor children or is behaving 21    in a violent or abusive manner.22        If necessary to protect any member of petitioner's 23    family or household from future abuse, respondent shall be 24    prohibited from coming to petitioner's residence to meet 25    the minor child for parenting time, and the parties shall 26    submit to the court their recommendations for reasonable   SB3329 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    alternative arrangements for parenting time. A person may 2    be approved to supervise parenting time only after filing 3    an affidavit accepting that responsibility and 4    acknowledging accountability to the court.5        (8) Removal or concealment of minor child. Prohibit 6    respondent from removing a minor child from the State or 7    concealing the child within the State.8        (9) Order to appear. Order the respondent to appear in 9    court, alone or with a minor child, to prevent abuse, 10    neglect, removal or concealment of the child, to return 11    the child to the custody or care of the petitioner or to 12    permit any court-ordered interview or examination of the 13    child or the respondent.14        (10) Possession of personal property. Grant petitioner 15    exclusive possession of personal property and, if 16    respondent has possession or control, direct respondent to 17    promptly make it available to petitioner, if:18            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 19        property; or20            (ii) the parties own the property jointly; sharing 21        it would risk abuse of petitioner by respondent or is 22        impracticable; and the balance of hardships favors 23        temporary possession by petitioner.24        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 25    property is that it is marital property, the court may 26    award petitioner temporary possession thereof under the   SB3329 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    standards of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph only if a 2    proper proceeding has been filed under the Illinois 3    Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as now or 4    hereafter amended.5        No order under this provision shall affect title to 6    property.7        (11) Protection of property. Forbid the respondent 8    from taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, 9    damaging or otherwise disposing of any real or personal 10    property, except as explicitly authorized by the court, 11    if:12            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 13        property; or14            (ii) the parties own the property jointly, and the 15        balance of hardships favors granting this remedy.16        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 17    property is that it is marital property, the court may 18    grant petitioner relief under subparagraph (ii) of this 19    paragraph only if a proper proceeding has been filed under 20    the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 21    now or hereafter amended.22        The court may further prohibit respondent from 23    improperly using the financial or other resources of an 24    aged member of the family or household for the profit or 25    advantage of respondent or of any other person.26        (11.5) Protection of animals. Grant the petitioner the   SB3329 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    exclusive care, custody, or control of any animal owned, 2    possessed, leased, kept, or held by either the petitioner 3    or the respondent or a minor child residing in the 4    residence or household of either the petitioner or the 5    respondent and order the respondent to stay away from the 6    animal and forbid the respondent from taking, 7    transferring, encumbering, concealing, harming, or 8    otherwise disposing of the animal. 9        (12) Order for payment of support. Order respondent to 10    pay temporary support for the petitioner or any child in 11    the petitioner's care or over whom the petitioner has been 12    allocated parental responsibility, when the respondent has 13    a legal obligation to support that person, in accordance 14    with the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage 15    Act, which shall govern, among other matters, the amount 16    of support, payment through the clerk and withholding of 17    income to secure payment. An order for child support may 18    be granted to a petitioner with lawful physical care of a 19    child, or an order or agreement for physical care of a 20    child, prior to entry of an order allocating significant 21    decision-making responsibility. Such a support order shall 22    expire upon entry of a valid order allocating parental 23    responsibility differently and vacating the petitioner's 24    significant decision-making authority, unless otherwise 25    provided in the order.26        (13) Order for payment of losses. Order respondent to   SB3329 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    pay petitioner for losses suffered as a direct result of 2    the abuse, neglect, or exploitation. Such losses shall 3    include, but not be limited to, medical expenses, lost 4    earnings or other support, repair or replacement of 5    property damaged or taken, reasonable attorney's fees, 6    court costs and moving or other travel expenses, including 7    additional reasonable expenses for temporary shelter and 8    restaurant meals.9            (i) Losses affecting family needs. If a party is 10        entitled to seek maintenance, child support or 11        property distribution from the other party under the 12        Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 13        now or hereafter amended, the court may order 14        respondent to reimburse petitioner's actual losses, to 15        the extent that such reimbursement would be 16        "appropriate temporary relief", as authorized by 17        subsection (a)(3) of Section 501 of that Act.18            (ii) Recovery of expenses. In the case of an 19        improper concealment or removal of a minor child, the 20        court may order respondent to pay the reasonable 21        expenses incurred or to be incurred in the search for 22        and recovery of the minor child, including but not 23        limited to legal fees, court costs, private 24        investigator fees, and travel costs.25        (14) Prohibition of entry. Prohibit the respondent 26    from entering or remaining in the residence or household   SB3329 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    while the respondent is under the influence of alcohol or 2    drugs and constitutes a threat to the safety and 3    well-being of the petitioner or the petitioner's children.4        (14.5) Prohibition of possession of firearms and 5    firearm parts; search and seizure of firearms and firearms 6    parts.7            (A)(i) Prohibit a respondent against whom an 8        emergency, interim, or plenary order of protection was 9        issued from possessing, during the duration of the 10        order, any firearms or firearm parts that could be 11        assembled into an operable firearm if a search warrant 12        is issued under (A-1) or the order:13                (aa) was issued after a hearing of which such 14            person received actual notice, and at which such 15            person had an opportunity to participate, or the 16            petitioner has satisfied the requirements of 17            Section 217;18                (bb) restrains such person from using physical 19            force; harassing, stalking, or threatening an 20            intimate partner of such person or child of such 21            intimate partner or person; or engaging in other 22            conduct that would place a petitioner an intimate 23            partner in reasonable fear of bodily injury to the 24            partner or child; and25                (cc) includes a finding that such person 26            represents a credible threat to the physical   SB3329 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1            safety of a petitioner such intimate partner or 2            child.3            (ii) The court shall order any respondent 4        prohibited from possessing firearms under item (i) of 5        subparagraph (A) to surrender any firearms or firearm 6        parts that could be assembled to make an operable 7        firearm. Any firearms or firearm parts on the 8        respondent's person or at the place of service shall 9        be surrendered to the serving officers at the time of 10        service of the order of protection, and any other 11        firearms or firearm parts shall be surrendered to 12        local law enforcement within 24 hours of service of 13        the order of protection. Any Firearm Owner's 14        Identification Card or Concealed Carry License in the 15        possession of the respondent, except as provided in 16        subparagraph (B), shall also be ordered by the court 17        to be turned over to the officer serving the order of 18        protection at the time of service or, if not on the 19        respondent's person or at the location where the 20        respondent is served at the time of service, to local 21        law enforcement within 24 hours of service of the 22        order of protection. The law enforcement agency shall 23        immediately mail the card, as well as any license, to 24        the Illinois State Police Firearm Owner's 25        Identification Card Office for safekeeping. 26            (A-1)(i) Upon issuance of an emergency, interim,   SB3329 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        or plenary order of protection and subject to the 2        provisions of item (ii) of this subparagraph (A-1), 3        the court shall issue a search warrant for the seizure 4        of any firearms or firearm parts that could be 5        assembled to make an operable firearm belonging to the 6        respondent if the court, based upon sworn testimony, 7        finds that: 8                (aa) the respondent poses a credible threat to 9            the physical safety of the petitioner protected by 10            the order of protection; and 11                (bb) probable cause exists to believe that:12                    (I) the respondent possesses firearms or 13                firearm parts that could be assembled to make 14                an operable firearm;15                    (II) the firearms or firearm parts that 16                could be assembled to make an operable firearm 17                are located at the residence, vehicle, or 18                other property of the respondent to be 19                searched; and20                    (III) the credible threat to the physical 21                safety of the petitioner protected by the 22                order of protection is immediate and present. 23            The record shall reflect the court's findings in 24        determining whether the search warrant shall be 25        issued. 26            (ii) If the petitioner does not seek a warrant   SB3329 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        under this subparagraph (A-1) or the court determines 2        that the requirements of this subparagraph (A-1) have 3        not been met, relief under subparagraph (A) alone may 4        be granted. 5            (iii) An ex parte search warrant shall be granted 6        under this subparagraph (A-1) only if the court finds 7        that:8                (aa) the elements of item (i) of subparagraph 9            (A-1) have been met;10                (bb) personal injury to the petitioner is 11            likely to occur if the respondent received prior 12            notice; and13                (cc) the petitioner has otherwise satisfied 14            the requirements of Section 217 of this Act. 15            (iv) Oral testimony is sufficient in lieu of an 16        affidavit to support a finding of probable cause. 17            (v) A search warrant issued under this 18        subparagraph (A-1) shall be directed by the court for 19        enforcement to the law enforcement agency with primary 20        responsibility for responding to calls for service at 21        the location to be searched or to another appropriate 22        law enforcement agency if justified by the 23        circumstances. The search warrant shall specify with 24        particularity the scope of the search, including the 25        property to be searched, and shall direct the law 26        enforcement agency to seize the respondent's firearms   SB3329 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        and firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 2        operable firearm. Law enforcement shall also be 3        directed to seize any Firearm Owner's Identification 4        Card and any Concealed Carry License belonging to the 5        respondent.6             (vi) The petitioner shall prepare an information 7        sheet, reviewed by the court, for law enforcement at 8        the time the warrant is granted. The information sheet 9        shall include:10                (aa) contact information for the petitioner, 11            the petitioner's attorney, or both, including a 12            telephone number and email, if available;13                (bb) a physical description of the respondent, 14            including the respondent's date of birth, if 15            known, or approximate age, height, weight, race, 16            and hair color;17                (cc) days and times that the respondent is 18            likely to be at the property to be searched, if 19            known; and20                (dd) whether people other than the respondent 21            are likely to be present at the property to be 22            searched and when, if known. 23            (vii) The information sheet shall be transmitted 24        to the law enforcement agency to which the search 25        warrant is directed in the same manner as the warrant 26        is transmitted under Section 222 of this Act.   SB3329 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1            (viii) If the court, after determining a search 2        warrant should issue, finds that the petitioner has 3        made a credible report of domestic violence to the 4        local law enforcement agency within the previous 90 5        days, law enforcement shall execute the warrant no 6        later than 96 hours after receipt of the warrant. If 7        the court finds that petitioner has not made such a 8        report, the law enforcement agency to which the court 9        has directed the warrant shall, within 48 hours of 10        receipt, evaluate the warrant and seek any corrections 11        to the warrant, and, if applicable, add to or negate 12        the warrant. If the law enforcement agency seeks to 13        negate the warrant, it shall take reasonable steps to 14        notify the petitioner before appearing before the 15        court. The record shall reflect the court's findings 16        in determining whether to correct, add, or negate the 17        warrant. If a change is made regarding the search 18        warrant, law enforcement shall execute the warrant no 19        later than 96 hours after the correction is issued. 20        The law enforcement agency shall notify the petitioner 21        of any changes to the warrant or if the warrant has 22        been negated. The law enforcement agency to which the 23        court has directed the warrant may coordinate with 24        other law enforcement agencies to execute the warrant. 25        A return of the warrant shall be filed by the law 26        enforcement agency within 24 hours of execution,   SB3329 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        setting forth the time, date, and location where the 2        warrant was executed and what items, if any, were 3        seized. If the court is not in session, the return 4        information shall be returned on the next date the 5        court is in session. Subject to the provisions of this 6        Section, peace officers shall have the same authority 7        to execute a warrant issued pursuant to this 8        subsection as a warrant issued under Article 108 of 9        the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. 10            (ix) Upon discovering a defect in the search 11        warrant, the appropriate law enforcement agency may 12        petition the court to correct the warrant. The law 13        enforcement agency shall notify the petitioner of any 14        such correction. 15            (x) Upon petition by the appropriate law 16        enforcement agency, the court may modify the search 17        warrant or extend the time to execute the search 18        warrant for a period of no more than 96 hours. If the 19        court is not in session, the law enforcement agency 20        may seek an extension and, if needed, modification on 21        the next day the court is in session. Any extension 22        granted under this paragraph shall run from the end of 23        the initial period to execute the warrant or the entry 24        of the extending order, whichever is later. In 25        determining whether to modify or extend the warrant, 26        the court shall consider:  SB3329 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1                (aa) any increased risk to the petitioner's 2            safety that may result from a modification or 3            extension of the warrant;4                (bb) any unnecessary risk to law enforcement 5            that would be mitigated by a modification or 6            extension of the warrant;7                (cc) any risks to third parties at the 8            location to be searched that would be mitigated by 9            a modification or extension of the warrant; and10                (dd) the likelihood of successful execution of 11            warrant.12            The record shall reflect the court's findings in 13        determining whether to extend or modify the warrant. 14        If seeking an extension of time to execute the 15        warrant, the law enforcement agency shall take 16        reasonable steps to notify the petitioner prior to 17        appearing before the court. The law enforcement agency 18        shall notify the petitioner of any modification or 19        extension of the warrant. 20            (xi) Service of any order of protection shall, to 21        the extent possible, be concurrent with the execution 22        of any search warrant under this paragraph. 23            (B) If the respondent is a peace officer as 24        defined in Section 2-13 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 25        the court shall order that any firearms used by the 26        respondent in the performance of his or her duties as a   SB3329 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        peace officer be surrendered to the chief law 2        enforcement executive of the agency in which the 3        respondent is employed, who shall retain the firearms 4        for safekeeping for the duration of the order of 5        protection.6            (C)(i) Any firearms or firearm parts that could be 7        assembled to make an operable firearm shall be kept by 8        the law enforcement agency that took possession of the 9        items for safekeeping, except as provided in 10        subparagraph (B). The period of safekeeping shall be 11        for the duration of the order of protection. Except as 12        provided in subparagraph (E), the respondent is 13        prohibited from transferring firearms or firearm parts 14        to another individual in lieu of surrender to law 15        enforcement. The law enforcement agency shall provide 16        an itemized statement of receipt to the respondent and 17        the court describing any seized or surrendered 18        firearms or firearm parts and informing the respondent 19        that the respondent may seek the return of the 20        respondent's items at the end of the order of 21        protection. The law enforcement agency may enter 22        arrangements, as needed, with federally licensed 23        firearm dealers or other law enforcement agencies for 24        the storage of any firearms seized or surrendered 25        under this subsection.26            (ii) It is the respondent's responsibility to   SB3329 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        request the return or reinstatement of any Firearm 2        Owner's Identification Card or Concealed Carry License 3        and notify the Illinois State Police Firearm Owner's 4        Identification Card Office at the end of the Order of 5        Protection.6            (iii) At the end of the order of protection, a 7        respondent may request the return of any seized or 8        surrendered firearms or firearm parts that could be 9        assembled to make an operable firearm. Such firearms 10        or firearm parts shall be returned within 14 days of 11        the request to the respondent, if the respondent is 12        lawfully eligible to possess firearms, or to a 13        designated third party who is lawfully eligible to 14        possess firearms. If the firearms or firearm parts 15        cannot be returned to respondent because (1) the 16        respondent has not requested the return or transfer of 17        the firearms or firearm parts as set forth in this 18        subparagraph, and (2) the respondent cannot be located 19        or fails to respond to more than 3 requests to retrieve 20        the firearms or firearm parts the court may, or is not 21        lawfully eligible to possess a firearm, upon petition 22        from the appropriate law enforcement agency and notice 23        to the respondent at the respondent's last known 24        address, order the law enforcement agency to destroy 25        the firearms or firearm parts; use the firearms or 26        firearm parts for training purposes or for any other   SB3329 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        application as deemed appropriate by the law 2        enforcement agency; or turn over the firearm or 3        firearm parts to a third party who is lawfully 4        eligible to possess firearms, and who does not reside 5        with respondent. 6            (D)(i) If a person other than the respondent 7        claims title to any firearms and firearm parts that 8        could be assembled to make an operable firearm seized 9        or surrendered under this subsection, the person may 10        petition the court to have the firearm and firearm 11        parts that could be assembled to make an operable 12        firearm returned to him or her with proper notice to 13        the petitioner and respondent. If, at a hearing on the 14        petition, the court determines the person to be the 15        lawful owner of the firearm and firearm parts that 16        could be assembled to make an operable firearm, the 17        firearm and firearm parts that could be assembled to 18        make an operable firearm shall be returned to the 19        person, provided that: 20                (aa) the firearm and firearm parts that could 21            be assembled to make an operable firearm are 22            removed from the respondent's custody, control, or 23            possession and the lawful owner agrees to store 24            the firearm and firearm parts that could be 25            assembled to make an operable firearm in a manner 26            such that the respondent does not have access to   SB3329 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1            or control of the firearm and firearm parts that 2            could be assembled to make an operable firearm; 3            and4                 (bb) the firearm and firearm parts that could 5            be assembled to make an operable firearm are not 6            otherwise unlawfully possessed by the owner. 7            (ii) The person petitioning for the return of his 8        or her firearm and firearm parts that could be 9        assembled to make an operable firearm must swear or 10        affirm by affidavit that he or she:11                (aa) is the lawful owner of the firearm and 12            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 13            operable firearm;14                (bb) shall not transfer the firearm and 15            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 16            operable firearm to the respondent; and17                (cc) will store the firearm and firearm parts 18            that could be assembled to make an operable 19            firearm in a manner that the respondent does not 20            have access to or control of the firearm and 21            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 22            operable firearm. 23            (E)(i) The respondent may file a motion to 24        transfer, at the next scheduled hearing, any seized or 25        surrendered firearms or firearm parts to a third 26        party. Notice of the motion shall be provided to the   SB3329 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        petitioner and the third party must appear at the 2        hearing. 3            (ii) The court may order transfer of the seized or 4        surrendered firearm or firearm parts only if:5                (aa) the third party transferee affirms by 6            affidavit and to the open court that: 7                    (I) the third party transferee does not 8                reside with the respondent; 9                    (II) the respondent does not have access 10                to the location in which the third party 11                transferee intends to keep the firearms or 12                firearm parts; 13                    (III) the third party transferee will not 14                transfer the firearm or firearm parts to the 15                respondent or anyone who resides with the 16                respondent; 17                    (IV) the third party transferee will 18                maintain control and possession of the firearm 19                or firearm parts until otherwise ordered by 20                the court; and 21                    (V) the third party transferee is aware 22                that transferring the firearms or firearm 23                parts or allowing the respondent access to the 24                firearms or firearm parts would be a violation 25                of Section 24-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012 26                will be subject to criminal penalties for   SB3329 Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1                transferring the firearms or firearm parts to 2                the respondent; and 3                (bb) the court finds that: 4                    (I) the third party respondent holds a 5                valid Firearm Owner's Identification; and6                    (II) the transfer of firearms or firearm 7                parts to the third party transferee does not 8                place the petitioner or any other protected 9                parties at any additional threat or risk of 10                harm. 11        (15) Prohibition of access to records. If an order of 12    protection prohibits respondent from having contact with 13    the minor child, or if petitioner's address is omitted 14    under subsection (b) of Section 203, or if necessary to 15    prevent abuse or wrongful removal or concealment of a 16    minor child, the order shall deny respondent access to, 17    and prohibit respondent from inspecting, obtaining, or 18    attempting to inspect or obtain, school or any other 19    records of the minor child who is in the care of 20    petitioner.21        (16) Order for payment of shelter services. Order 22    respondent to reimburse a shelter providing temporary 23    housing and counseling services to the petitioner for the 24    cost of the services, as certified by the shelter and 25    deemed reasonable by the court.26        (17) Order for injunctive relief. Enter injunctive   SB3329 Enrolled- 70 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    relief necessary or appropriate to prevent further abuse 2    of a family or household member or further abuse, neglect, 3    or exploitation of a high-risk adult with disabilities or 4    to effectuate one of the granted remedies, if supported by 5    the balance of hardships. If the harm to be prevented by 6    the injunction is abuse or any other harm that one of the 7    remedies listed in paragraphs (1) through (16) of this 8    subsection is designed to prevent, no further evidence is 9    necessary that the harm is an irreparable injury.10        (18) Telephone services.11            (A) Unless a condition described in subparagraph 12        (B) of this paragraph exists, the court may, upon 13        request by the petitioner, order a wireless telephone 14        service provider to transfer to the petitioner the 15        right to continue to use a telephone number or numbers 16        indicated by the petitioner and the financial 17        responsibility associated with the number or numbers, 18        as set forth in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph. 19        For purposes of this paragraph (18), the term 20        "wireless telephone service provider" means a provider 21        of commercial mobile service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 22        332. The petitioner may request the transfer of each 23        telephone number that the petitioner, or a minor child 24        in his or her custody, uses. The clerk of the court 25        shall serve the order on the wireless telephone 26        service provider's agent for service of process   SB3329 Enrolled- 71 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        provided to the Illinois Commerce Commission. The 2        order shall contain all of the following:3                (i) The name and billing telephone number of 4            the account holder including the name of the 5            wireless telephone service provider that serves 6            the account.7                (ii) Each telephone number that will be 8            transferred.9                (iii) A statement that the provider transfers 10            to the petitioner all financial responsibility for 11            and right to the use of any telephone number 12            transferred under this paragraph.13            (B) A wireless telephone service provider shall 14        terminate the respondent's use of, and shall transfer 15        to the petitioner use of, the telephone number or 16        numbers indicated in subparagraph (A) of this 17        paragraph unless it notifies the petitioner, within 72 18        hours after it receives the order, that one of the 19        following applies:20                (i) The account holder named in the order has 21            terminated the account.22                (ii) A difference in network technology would 23            prevent or impair the functionality of a device on 24            a network if the transfer occurs.25                (iii) The transfer would cause a geographic or 26            other limitation on network or service provision   SB3329 Enrolled- 72 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1            to the petitioner.2                (iv) Another technological or operational 3            issue would prevent or impair the use of the 4            telephone number if the transfer occurs.5            (C) The petitioner assumes all financial 6        responsibility for and right to the use of any 7        telephone number transferred under this paragraph. In 8        this paragraph, "financial responsibility" includes 9        monthly service costs and costs associated with any 10        mobile device associated with the number.11            (D) A wireless telephone service provider may 12        apply to the petitioner its routine and customary 13        requirements for establishing an account or 14        transferring a number, including requiring the 15        petitioner to provide proof of identification, 16        financial information, and customer preferences.17            (E) Except for willful or wanton misconduct, a 18        wireless telephone service provider is immune from 19        civil liability for its actions taken in compliance 20        with a court order issued under this paragraph.21            (F) All wireless service providers that provide 22        services to residential customers shall provide to the 23        Illinois Commerce Commission the name and address of 24        an agent for service of orders entered under this 25        paragraph (18). Any change in status of the registered 26        agent must be reported to the Illinois Commerce   SB3329 Enrolled- 73 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        Commission within 30 days of such change. 2            (G) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall 3        maintain the list of registered agents for service for 4        each wireless telephone service provider on the 5        Commission's website. The Commission may consult with 6        wireless telephone service providers and the Circuit 7        Court Clerks on the manner in which this information 8        is provided and displayed. 9    (c) Relevant factors; findings.10        (1) In determining whether to grant a specific remedy, 11    other than payment of support, the court shall consider 12    relevant factors, including but not limited to the 13    following:14            (i) the nature, frequency, severity, pattern and 15        consequences of the respondent's past abuse, neglect 16        or exploitation of the petitioner or any family or 17        household member, including the concealment of his or 18        her location in order to evade service of process or 19        notice, and the likelihood of danger of future abuse, 20        neglect, or exploitation to petitioner or any member 21        of petitioner's or respondent's family or household; 22        and23            (ii) the danger that any minor child will be 24        abused or neglected or improperly relocated from the 25        jurisdiction, improperly concealed within the State or 26        improperly separated from the child's primary   SB3329 Enrolled- 74 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        caretaker.2        (2) In comparing relative hardships resulting to the 3    parties from loss of possession of the family home, the 4    court shall consider relevant factors, including but not 5    limited to the following:6            (i) availability, accessibility, cost, safety, 7        adequacy, location and other characteristics of 8        alternate housing for each party and any minor child 9        or dependent adult in the party's care;10            (ii) the effect on the party's employment; and11            (iii) the effect on the relationship of the party, 12        and any minor child or dependent adult in the party's 13        care, to family, school, church and community.14        (3) Subject to the exceptions set forth in paragraph 15    (4) of this subsection, the court shall make its findings 16    in an official record or in writing, and shall at a minimum 17    set forth the following:18            (i) That the court has considered the applicable 19        relevant factors described in paragraphs (1) and (2) 20        of this subsection.21            (ii) Whether the conduct or actions of respondent, 22        unless prohibited, will likely cause irreparable harm 23        or continued abuse.24            (iii) Whether it is necessary to grant the 25        requested relief in order to protect petitioner or 26        other alleged abused persons.  SB3329 Enrolled- 75 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1        (4) For purposes of issuing an ex parte emergency 2    order of protection, the court, as an alternative to or as 3    a supplement to making the findings described in 4    paragraphs (c)(3)(i) through (c)(3)(iii) of this 5    subsection, may use the following procedure:6        When a verified petition for an emergency order of 7    protection in accordance with the requirements of Sections 8    203 and 217 is presented to the court, the court shall 9    examine petitioner on oath or affirmation. An emergency 10    order of protection shall be issued by the court if it 11    appears from the contents of the petition and the 12    examination of petitioner that the averments are 13    sufficient to indicate abuse by respondent and to support 14    the granting of relief under the issuance of the emergency 15    order of protection.16        (5) Never married parties. No rights or 17    responsibilities for a minor child born outside of 18    marriage attach to a putative father until a father and 19    child relationship has been established under the Illinois 20    Parentage Act of 1984, the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, 21    the Illinois Public Aid Code, Section 12 of the Vital 22    Records Act, the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the Probate 23    Act of 1975, the Revised Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of 24    Support Act, the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, 25    the Expedited Child Support Act of 1990, any judicial, 26    administrative, or other act of another state or   SB3329 Enrolled- 76 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    territory, any other Illinois statute, or by any foreign 2    nation establishing the father and child relationship, any 3    other proceeding substantially in conformity with the 4    Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity 5    Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Pub. L. 104-193), or where 6    both parties appeared in open court or at an 7    administrative hearing acknowledging under oath or 8    admitting by affirmation the existence of a father and 9    child relationship. Absent such an adjudication, finding, 10    or acknowledgment, no putative father shall be granted 11    temporary allocation of parental responsibilities, 12    including parenting time with the minor child, or physical 13    care and possession of the minor child, nor shall an order 14    of payment for support of the minor child be entered.15    (d) Balance of hardships; findings. If the court finds 16that the balance of hardships does not support the granting of 17a remedy governed by paragraph (2), (3), (10), (11), or (16) of 18subsection (b) of this Section, which may require such 19balancing, the court's findings shall so indicate and shall 20include a finding as to whether granting the remedy will 21result in hardship to respondent that would substantially 22outweigh the hardship to petitioner from denial of the remedy. 23The findings shall be an official record or in writing.24    (e) Denial of remedies. Denial of any remedy shall not be 25based, in whole or in part, on evidence that:26        (1) Respondent has cause for any use of force, unless   SB3329 Enrolled- 77 -LRB104 17833 RLC 31267 b1    that cause satisfies the standards for justifiable use of 2    force provided by Article 7 of the Criminal Code of 2012;3        (2) Respondent was voluntarily intoxicated;4        (3) Petitioner acted in self-defense or defense of 5    another, provided that, if petitioner utilized force, such 6    force was justifiable under Article 7 of the Criminal Code 7    of 2012; 8        (4) Petitioner did not act in self-defense or defense 9    of another;10        (5) Petitioner left the residence or household to 11    avoid further abuse, neglect, or exploitation by 12    respondent;13        (6) Petitioner did not leave the residence or 14    household to avoid further abuse, neglect, or exploitation 15    by respondent;16        (7) Conduct by any family or household member excused 17    the abuse, neglect, or exploitation by respondent, unless 18    that same conduct would have excused such abuse, neglect, 19    or exploitation if the parties had not been family or 20    household members.21(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-1065, eff. 5-11-25.)